Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 6.1. Energy and Operational Efficiency Performance-Based Contracting Act.

§§ 11-34.1 through 11-34.4.

Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For § 11-34.2 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1702

.

For § 11-34.3 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1703

.

For § 11-34.4 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1704

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

11-34.1

, pertaining to legislative intent, derived from 2001, c. 219.

Former § 11-34.2, pertaining to definitions, derived from 2001, c. 219. For § 11-34.2 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1702

.

Former § 11-34.3, pertaining to Energy Performance-Based Contract Procedures; required contract provisions, derived from 2001, c. 219; 2004, c. 197; 2009, c. 399; 2013, c. 583; 2017, c. 259. For § 11-34.3 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1703

.

Former § 11-34.4, pertaining to application of chapter, derived from 2001, c. 219. For § 11-34.4 as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1704

.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 45.1 or such other titles of the Code of Virginia as are in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 45.1 and repeal of Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2021 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 5 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, nor the enactment of Title 45.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2021, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2021, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2021, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 45.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 7 provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 45.2 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 45.2 are declared severable.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 8 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or other contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 9 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any properly recorded deed that was recorded prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 10 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 12 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after October 1, 2021, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532 amended § 11-34.3 effective October 1, 2021, to substitute “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.” Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 repeals and recodifies this section as §

45.2-1703

. The recodified section was rewritten in such a way that the Department name no longer appears and so the amendment was not given effect.